District of Columbia statutes.
1-611.20

Mandatory direct deposit.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the only method for the receipt of salary, wages, or any other compensation, and retirement payments by any District of Columbia employee or retiree, whether compensated by the District with District funds or federal funds, shall consist of one of the following:

(1)

Direct deposit through electronic funds transfer to a checking, savings, or account designated by the employee or retiree; or

(2)

The delivery of the check by U.S. mail to the employee’s or retiree’s place of residence.

(b)

The Mayor is authorized to issue rules to implement this section.

History

March 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1120
as added Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 601, 44 DCR 7378
Nov. 19, 1997, 111 Stat. 2185, Pub. L. 105-100,§ 156

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-612.20.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(a) of Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act Pilot Program Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-47, April 27, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 1508).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 601 of Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Temporary Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-59, March 20, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2094).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of section, see § 2(a) of the Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act Pilot Program Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-120, August 1, 1997, 44 DCR 4643), and see § 2(a) of the Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act Pilot Program Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-178, October 30, 1997, 44 DCR 6946).
For temporary addition of section, see § 601 of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-152, October 17, 1997, 44 DCR 6197), and see § 601 of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-239, January 13, 1998, 45 DCR 508).

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 12-60: Section 2002 of D.C. Law 12-60 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 1997.